ASPELL6/portugues/pt_PT.aff
SFX t Y 24
SFX t   o              ista           [^cÇÃi]o
SFX t   co             quista         co
SFX t   0              0              Ço
SFX t   0              0              ÇÃo
SFX t   0              0s             sÃo
SFX t   0              0io            io
SFX t   a              ista           [^iÇg]a
SFX t   a              sta            ia
SFX t   0              0              Ça
SFX t   a              uista          ga
SFX t   e              ista           e
SFX t   0              ista           [lr]
SFX t   o              istas          [^cÇÃ]o
SFX t   co             quistas        co
SFX t   0              0              Ço
SFX t   0              0              ÇÃo
SFX t   0              0s             sÃo
SFX t   0              0io            io
SFX t   a              istas          [^iÇg]a
SFX t   a              stas           ia
SFX t   0              0              Ça
SFX t   a              uistas         ga
SFX t   e              istas          e
SFX t   0              istas          [lr]

SFX h Y 44
SFX h   o              inho           [^cgÇÃi]o
SFX h   co             quinho         co
SFX h   0              0              Ço
SFX h   o              uinho          go
SFX h   0              zinho          Ão
SFX h   e              inho           e
SFX h   0              inho           [^Ê][sz]
SFX h   0              0              Ês
SFX h   0              zinho          [irun]
SFX h   0              0              Ó
SFX h   0              0              Ô
SFX h   0              0              É
SFX h   0              0              Ú
SFX h   m              nzinho         m
SFX h   0              zinho          l
SFX h   o              inhos          [^cgÇÃi]o
SFX h   co             quinhos        co
SFX h   0              0              Ço
SFX h   o              uinhos         go
SFX h   0              zinhos         Ão
SFX h   e              inhos          e
SFX h   0              inhos          [^Ê][sz]
SFX h   0              0              Ês
SFX h   0              zinhos         [irun]
SFX h   0              0              Ó
SFX h   0              0              Ô
SFX h   0              0              É
SFX h   0              0              Ú
SFX h   m              nzinhos        m
SFX h   0              zinhos         l
SFX h   o              inha           [^cgÇÃi]o
SFX h   a              inha           [^Çg]a
SFX h   ca             quinha         ca
SFX h   0              0              Ça
SFX h   a              uinha          ga
SFX h   0              0              Á
SFX h   0              0              Ã
SFX h   o              inhas          [^cgÇÃi]o
SFX h   a              inhas          [^Çg]a
SFX h   ca             quinhas        ca
SFX h   0              0              Ça
SFX h   a              uinhas         ga
SFX h   0              0              Á
SFX h   0              0              Ã

SFX z N 4
SFX z   0              zinho          [^Ã][eo]
SFX z   0              inho           l
SFX z   0              zinhos         [^Ã][eo]
SFX z   0              inhos          l

SFX c Y 8
SFX c   0              0r             [ae]r
SFX c   0              0r             [^zg]ir
SFX c   0              0zir           zir
SFX c   r              si             por
SFX c   0              0r             [ae]r
SFX c   0              0r             [^zg]ir
SFX c   0              0zir           zir
SFX c   r              si             por

SFX C Y 6
SFX C   0              0ionar         cionar
SFX C   ir             c              air
SFX C   0              0ir            uir
SFX C   0              0ionar         cionar
SFX C   ir             c              air
SFX C   0              0ir            uir

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   r              mento          [ai]r
SFX M   er             imento         er
SFX M   r              mentos         [ai]r
SFX M   er             imentos        er

SFX n Y 6
SFX n   r              nte            [ae]r
SFX n   ir             ente           ir
SFX n   r              nente          or
SFX n   r              ntes           [ae]r
SFX n   ir             entes          ir
SFX n   r              nentes         or

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   r              dor            [aei]r
SFX D   r              dora           [aei]r
SFX D   r              dores          [aei]r
SFX D   r              doras          [aei]r

SFX v Y 6
SFX v   0              0ar            ar
SFX v   0              0er            er
SFX v   0              0ir            ir
SFX v   0              0ar            ar
SFX v   0              0er            er
SFX v   0              0ir            ir

SFX X Y 94
SFX X   ar             o              [^\-]ar
SFX X   r              s              ar
SFX X   ar             a              [^\-]ar
SFX X   r              mos            ar
SFX X   r              is             ar
SFX X   r              m              ar
SFX X   ar             e              [^cgÇ]ar
SFX X   car            que            car
SFX X   gar            gue            gar
SFX X   0              0              Çar
SFX X   ar             es             [^cgÇ]ar
SFX X   car            ques           car
SFX X   gar            gues           gar
SFX X   0              0              Çar
SFX X   ar             emos           [^cgÇ]ar
SFX X   car            quemos         car
SFX X   gar            guemos         gar
SFX X   0              0              Çar
SFX X   ar             eis            [^cgÇ]ar
SFX X   car            queis          car
SFX X   gar            gueis          gar
SFX X   0              0              Çar
SFX X   ar             em             [^cgÇ]ar
SFX X   car            quem           car
SFX X   gar            guem           gar
SFX X   0              0              Çar
SFX X   r              i              ar
SFX X   er             o              [^cug\-]er
SFX X   0              0cer           cer
SFX X   ger            jo             ger
SFX X   guer           go             guer
SFX X   r              s              er
SFX X   er             e              er
SFX X   r              mos            er
SFX X   r              is             er
SFX X   r              m              er
SFX X   er             a              [^cug\-]er
SFX X   0              0cer           cer
SFX X   ger            ja             ger
SFX X   guer           ga             guer
SFX X   er             as             [^cug]er
SFX X   0              0cer           cer
SFX X   ger            jas            ger
SFX X   guer           gas            guer
SFX X   er             amos           [^cug]er
SFX X   0              0cer           cer
SFX X   ger            jamos          ger
SFX X   guer           gamos          guer
SFX X   er             ais            [^cug]er
SFX X   0              0cer           cer
SFX X   ger            jais           ger
SFX X   guer           gais           guer
SFX X   er             am             [^cug]er
SFX X   0              0cer           cer
SFX X   ger            jam            ger
SFX X   guer           gam            guer
SFX X   r              i              er
SFX X   ir             o              [^cug\-]ir
SFX X   0              0cir           cir
SFX X   gir            jo             gir
SFX X   quir           co             quir
SFX X   uir            o              guir
SFX X   ir             es             ir
SFX X   ir             e              ir
SFX X   r              mos            ir
SFX X   r              s              ir
SFX X   ir             em             ir
SFX X   ir             a              [^cug\-]ir
SFX X   0              0cir           cir
SFX X   gir            ja             gir
SFX X   quir           ca             quir
SFX X   uir            a              guir
SFX X   ir             as             [^cug]ir
SFX X   0              0cir           cir
SFX X   gir            jas            gir
SFX X   quir           cas            quir
SFX X   uir            as             guir
SFX X   ir             amos           [^cug]ir
SFX X   0              0cir           cir
SFX X   gir            jamos          gir
SFX X   quir           camos          quir
SFX X   uir            amos           guir
SFX X   ir             ais            [^cug]ir
SFX X   0              0cir           cir
SFX X   gir            jais           gir
SFX X   quir           cais           quir
SFX X   uir            ais            guir
SFX X   ir             am             [^cug]ir
SFX X   0              0cir           cir
SFX X   gir            jam            gir
SFX X   quir           cam            quir
SFX X   uir            am             guir
SFX X   0              0ar            ar
SFX X   0              0er            er
